dictsource/nl_rules
// translation rules for Dutch
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Suffix rule: SUFX_E  eg. S2e  means double the vowel before the final consonant

.L01  g k
.L02  _ t_ d_ de_ den_  nen_ // verb endings ('nen' for 'scannen')


.group a
             a            a:
             a (CK        A
             a (x         A
             aa           a:
             aai          a:j
             ae           a:
             ai           Aj
             au           VU
             auw          VU
             aauw         VU
             ay           a:j

        @@C) a (_         =a:
          _) aan (@P3     'a:n
          &) aar (_S3     a:r
          &) aard (_S4    a:rt
             aa (rd_      'a:
             aa (C_       'a:
          z) aa (m_       a:
          t) a (bleau     a:
          @) abel (_      'a:b@l
          @) abele (_     'a:b@l@
          @) ace (_       e:s       // ?? interface
          m) ach (in      %a:S
          _) actie (@P5   'Aksi
          @) achtig (_S6   Axt@Q   // not -ig sufix
         Km) acht (ig+     Axt  // not -achtig
         kr) acht (ig+     Axt
          
          _) a (dress+++    a:
          _) adres (@P5   a:dr'Es
          _) af (C@P2     'Af
          _) affich       %AfiS
          _) af (rika     a:f
             age (_       'a:Z@
             ages (_S1    s
             age (_$w_alt a:Q@
             aille (_     'Aj@
             ailles (_    'Aj@s
           m) ail         e:Il
          _) ai (mabel    E
             aire (_      'E:r@
             air (_       'Er
          d) ai (sy       e:
          @) agne (_      'An^@
          _) alles (@P5   Al@z
          @) ant (_       'Ant
          @) ant (e_      'Ant
          @) ant (en_     'Ant
          @) ant (er_     'Ant
             ao (_        'VU   // cacao
          @) ares (_      a:r'Es
             aris (_      'a:rIs
             arissen (_   'a:rIs@n
             a (tor_      'a:

          @) a (de_       'a:
          @) a (ta_       'a:
           b)a (by          e:


.group b
             b            b     // auto-devoice at end-of-word
          b) b
             bs (_N       ps

             baan         ba:n
          &) baar (_S4    =ba:r
          &) bare (_S4    =ba:r@
          _) bedrijfs (@P8 b@dr'EIfs
          _) belasting (@P9 b@l'AstIN
          _) beleids (@P7 b@l'EIts
          _) bij (C@P3    b'EI
             bij (zond    b%i
          _) bijeen       bEI'e:n
          _) binnen (P6   b'In@n
          _) boek (@P4    b'uk
          _) boek (je     b'uk
          _) boven (P5    b'o:v@n
          _) braille (@P7 br'Aj@
          _) brand        br'And
          _) buiten (P6   b'Wyt@n
          _) buurt (@@P5  b'yrt   // buurtbewoner

         _o) b (stak      p


.group be
          _) be (@P2      b@
          _) bee (+       be:
          _) be (CjeK     bE
          _) be (C%       bE
          _) be (CCe_     bE
          _) be (CCen_    bE
          _) be (Cer_     be:
          _) be (cC       bE
          _) be (del      be:
          _) bei (de      bEI
          _) beie (r      bEi@
          _) bei (tel     bEI
             be (lg       bE
          _) be (ngel     bE
          _) be (ren      bI:
          _) be (rm       bE
          _) be (stia     bE
          _) be (ter      be:
          _) be (ven_     be:
          _) bever        be:v@r
          _) be (zem      be:
          _) be (zig      be:
          _) beu          bY:
          _) bezoekers (@P9 b@z'uk@rs


.group c
             c (e         s
             c (i         s
             c (y         s
             c            k
             ci (a        S
          @) ci (eel      S
          @) ci (eus      S
          @) ci (euz      S
          @) ci (ë        S
             ci (o        S
             ck           k
             
             ces (_       s'Es
             ce (s_$p_alt1 s@
             coach        ko:tS
          _) computer (@P8 kOmpj'ut@r 
          _) congres      kOnQr'Es
          _) concentratie (@P12 kOnsEntr'a:tsi
             co (ncert    k%O


.group ch
             ch           x
          _) ch           S
          _) ch (ador     tS
          _) ch (ao       x
          _) chang (e     SA~Z
          _) chaperon     S,Ap@rO~n
          _) charg (@     SArZ
          _) ch (ari      x
          _) ch (arter    tS
          _) chau (ffe    S%o:
          _) chau (vin    S,o:
             ch (é        S
          &) che (_       =S
          _) ch (emi      x
          _) cheque       SEk
          _) cherry       tSEri
          _) chi (cane    S%i
          _) ch (ip       tS
          _) ch (lo       x
          _) ch (ole      x
          _) cho (que     SO
          _) ch (or       x
          _) ch (r        x
          _) ch (rist     k
       blan) ch           S
        bro) ch (e        S
        bro) ch (u        S
       brun) ch           S
       deta) ch           S
        mar) ch           S
        _po) ch (e        S
      revan) ch (e        S


.group d
             d            d     // auto-devoice at end-of-word
          d) d
             dt           t
             ds (_N       ts
             d (st        t
//          _) de (CC@P2      d@  // Used a lot in family names
          _) de (geen     d@    // degene, degenen
          _) de (zelf     d@
          _) dj           dZ
             dj           tj

         _) doel (@P4     d'ul


.group e
             e            e#  // [e:] but change to [@] in unstressed syllables
          X) e            e:  // first syllable in a word

          &) e (_         @
             e (CK        E
             e (x         E
             e (r         I:
             eï (+        @_I
             ei (+        EI
             ee (r        I:
             ee           e:
             eeuw         eU
             eu           Y:

         &C) e (_S1qd     @
        KAC) e (_S1e      @   // remove 'e' and double the vowel
          c) e (_++       @
        KAj) e (_S1       @
         el) e (_+S1qd    @
         er) e (_+S1qd    @
         ig) e (_+S1qdm   @
       lijk) e (_S1m      @

             ea (_        'e:a:
        lin) ea (_        =ija:
             eau          'o: //words with French origin
//             eau (_       'o:
          @) ee (_        'e:
          @) ee (X_       'e:
          @) ee (r_       'I
          h) ee (r_       I:
          @) ee (rt_      'I
          @) ee (rd_      'I
          @) ee (rde_     'I
          @) ee (rden_    'I
          @) e (rende_    'I
          @) e (renden_   'I
         it) eit (_       'EIt
          @) el (_        'El
        app) el (_         @l
          &) eld (_       @ld
          &) ele (_       'e:l@

          &) el (_$p_alt   =@l
          &) el (e_$p_alt  =@l
          &) el (en_$p_alt =@l
          &) el (t_$p_alt  =@l
          &) el (de_$p_alt =@l
          &) el (den_$p_alt =@l
          &) el (end_$p_alt =@l
          &) el (ing_$p_alt =@l
          &) el (ingen_$p_alt =@l
          &) el (ig_$p_alt  =@l
          &) el (ige_$p_alt =@l

          @) elen (_      'e:l@n
          @) el (en_$p_alt2 @L
          @) elds (_      @lts
          &) elijks       @l@ks
          
          &) em (_        @m
          &) emen (_$w_alt @m@n
      waarn) em           e:m
          &) e (ment      @
             eden (_        e:d@n  // ?? 
             
	  @) e (s_$p_alt2+S1 s

          @) etten (_S3   @n 
             
             euille       @'y
             eum (_$w_alt 'e:8m
       @mus) eum (_       ,e:8m  // compounds
          @) eur (_       'Y:r

          &) e (nB@       E2
          &) e (ntig      @
         _p) e (nibel     e:
         id) e (nt        E
       pres) e (nt        E

          i) eus (_       'Y:s
          i) euze (_      'Y:z@
          i) euzer (_     'Y:z@r
          i) euzere (_    'Y:z@r@
          i) eust (_      'Y:st
          i) euste (_     'Y:st@
             exe (_       'Eks@

       proc) e (du        e:
          s) e (cuur      @   // secure
          s) e (cond      @
          c) e (ntrum     E   // not @
          _) expositie    Ekspo:z'itsi
             e (rtsD      E

.group en
          &) en (issen_   @n

          &) en (_S2qd    @n
        KAC) en (_S2e     @n   // flag 'e' means double the previous vowel
        KAj) en (_S2      @n
        KAx) en (_S2      @n
        and) en (_S2      @n
         ie) en (_S2      @n
        &ik) en (_S2      @n
         el) en (_+S2qd   @n
         er) en (_+S2qd   @n

          &) en (e_$p_altS3e  =@n@   // flag 'e' means double the previous vowel
          &) en (en_$p_altS4e =@n@n
          &) en (t_$p_altS3e  =@nt

          &) ens (_S3q    @ns
         ll) en (_S3      @n
          &) end (_       @nd
          &) ende (_S1    @
          &) enden (_S2   @n
          @) ent (_       'Ent
          @) ent (e_      'Ent
          @) ent (en_     'Ent
          @) ent (er_     'Ent
          @) ent (ere_    'Ent
          @) ent (st_     'Ent
          @) ent (ste_    'Ent
         ag) ent          'Ent

         
.group er
          @) er (ing_     'I:r
          @) er (ingen_   'I:r
          &) er (_$p_alt   =@r
          &) er (e_$p_alt  =@r
          &) er (en_$p_alt =@r     // where 'eren' is not a verb ending
          &) er (t_$p_alt  =@r
          &) er (d_$p_alt  =@r
          &) er (de_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (den_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (der_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (end_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (ende_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (ing_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (ingen_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (ig_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (ige_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (st_$p_alt  =@r
          &) er (ste_$p_alt  =@r
          _) er (@P2      Er
          &) er (_        @r
          &) ere (_       @r@
             eren (_      'I:r@n
             erend (_     'I:r@nd
          @) eres (_S4qd  @r'Es
          @) eressen (_S7sq @r'Es@n

//          @) erder (_     @rd@r
          
             erie (_      @r'i
             er (ij_      @r
        tol) er (abel     @r
        mis) er (abel     @r
       hond) er (d_       @r
          _) erger        ErQ@r  // ergeren
          &) era (_       @ra:
          @) er (aar_     @r
          &) er (C@       E2r
          
          &) erwijs (_S6m    @rv#EIs
          
.group es
             es (_$w_alt4+ 'Es
          X) es (_        Es
         @j) es (_S1       s
         @z) es (_S1      s  
          @) es (_S2qd    'Es   // double the previous vowel
          @) es (_$w_alt2S1 s   // just remove 's'
        KAC) es (_S2e     @s
         mb) es (_S1      s
         fd) es (_S1      s
         nd) es (_S1      s
         rd) es (_S1      s
         gt) es (_S1      s
         lt) es (_S1      s
         mt) es (_S1      s
         nt) es (_S1      s
         wt) es (_S1      s
             es (ie_      e:z
          @) essen (_S5qd 'Es@n
          @) es    (_$p_alt @s  // for wors which end on [@] with multiple on 's'.
          @) esisch      'e:zis

          
.group ê
             ê            E

.group f
             f            f
          f) f
             f (b         v
             f (d         v
             
          _) familie (@P7 fa:m'ili


.group g
             g            Q    // ph_dutch changes to [x] before unvoiced, NULL after [x]
             gg           Q
          s) g            x
          
          _) gast (@      Q'Ast
          _) gasten (@P6  Q'Ast@n
             g (é         Z
             g (ee_       Z
        _lo) g (eer       Z
        _lo) g (eren      Z
     collee) g            Z  // college
          @) gi (eus      Z
          @) gi (euz      Z
       reli) gi (eu       Qij
          _) goog (el     gu:g
       ener) g (ie        Z
       
         si) gn (a       n^
